Tennessee statutes. Title 69 Waters, Waterways, Drains And Levees
Part 11

Multi-County Districts — Alternative Procedure

69-5-1101. Legislative intent.

It is the intention of this part to provide an additional method of proceedings in the establishment of improvement or drainage districts, lying in more than one (1) county, and to leave the parties concerned, and petitioners for the improvement or drainage districts, to their option whether they will proceed under one (1) or the other alternative methods in creating such districts where the lands to be included lie in more than one (1) county.

Acts 1915, ch. 61, § 7; Shan., § 3871a169; mod. Code 1932, § 4405; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-1506; T.C.A. §69-6-1101.

69-5-1102. Petition for formation.

When a proposed improvement, drainage district, or drainage and levee district will require its location in more than one (1) county, the application by petition may in the alternative be made to the county court of any one (1) of the counties in which such district will be in part located, if established, such petition to be signed by persons residing in, and owning lands in, any one (1) or more of the counties. The court in which such petition is filed shall have full jurisdiction in the premises for the purpose of creating and establishing such drainage or drainage and levee district. It is not necessary to file such petition in the county court of any other county in which some of the lands lie that are to be included in the proposed district.

Acts 1915, ch. 61, § 1; Shan., § 3871a162; mod. Code 1932, § 4398; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-1507; T.C.A. §69-6-1102.

Compiler's Notes. The county court structure referred to in this chapter was abolished by the 1978 amendments to Tenn. Const. arts. VI and VII. Legislative functions formerly exercised by county courts now belong to county legislative bodies. Judicial functions now belong to general sessions, chancery, or circuit courts. See also §69-5-102.

69-5-1103. Engineer, viewers, commissioners, and directors.

The court in which the petition is filed has full power and authority to appoint the engineer, viewers to assess damages, commissioners to make assessments and apportion the same on the lands affected, and directors, just as if such district lay wholly in one (1) county, and as provided in parts 1-7 of this chapter, when such district lies entirely in one (1) county. The viewers and commissioners shall make their reports to the court where the petition was filed and only to that court. The county mayor of the county where such petition is filed shall be, ex officio, chair of such board of directors. The viewers and commissioners may be resident citizens of any one (1) or more of the counties having lands embraced in such district, but with all the other qualifications set out in parts 2 and 3 of this chapter.

Acts 1915, ch. 61, § 2; Shan., § 3871a163; Code 1932, § 4399; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 16, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-1508; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2; T.C.A. §69-6-1103.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

69-5-1104. Assessments.

The assessments levied on the lands shall be made in and by the court where the petition was filed and the proceeding is pending, as provided in part 8 of this chapter as to assessments where the district is wholly in one (1) county, such assessments to be made on the lands in all of the counties included within the district. The clerk of the county in which the petition is filed and the proceeding pending shall make out the drainage assessment book in which the assessment for the entire district appears. The clerk shall then copy so much of the drainage assessment book as contains the assessment of lands in any other county than that where the petition was filed and proceeding is pending, certify under seal that it is a correct copy of that portion, or part of such book, and transmit or deliver it, to the trustee of such other county, taking a clerk's receipt for the copy.

Acts 1915, ch. 61, § 3; Shan., § 3871a164; Code 1932, § 4400; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 22, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-1509; T.C.A. §69-6-1104.

Cross-References. Drainage assessment book, §69-5-813.

69-5-1105. Disposition of collected assessments.

It is the duty of the trustee of any county in which part of the lands of such district lie to receive the certified copy mentioned in §69-5-1104, and to collect the assessments shown by the same, as provided in part 8 of this chapter where the district lies entirely in one (1) county, and to duly account for and pay over the same when collected. The trustee collecting such assessments in any county shall pay the same upon the warrants drawn on the trustee by the county mayor of the county where the proceeding is pending, or petition was filed, as provided by law. Such warrants may be drawn to transfer such amounts collected from the hands of the trustee of any other county to the trustee of the county where the proceeding is pending, to the end that all the vouchers for money disbursed shall be on file in the county where the proceeding is pending.

Acts 1915, ch. 61, § 4; Shan., § 3871a165; Code 1932, § 4401; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 16, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-1510; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2; T.C.A. §69-6-1105.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

69-5-1106. Assessments become liens.

The assessments provided for by this part, when made and levied shall be and become valid liens upon all the lands so assessed as state and county taxes are liens upon lands.

Acts 1915, ch. 61, § 5; Shan., § 3871a166; mod. Code 1932, § 4402; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-1511; T.C.A. §69-6-1106.

69-5-1107. Bonds.

Bonds may be issued by such drainage district, or drainage and levee district, located in more than one (1) county, to pay for the cost and expenses of the proposed improvement in the general method provided in part 9 of this chapter. Such bonds shall be signed by the county mayor of each of the counties that have lands in such district, and countersigned by the county clerk of each of the counties, and the county seal, or seal of the county clerk, of each county shall be affixed to such bonds by each of the clerks, and the bonds shall be signed and sealed first by the officers of counties other than that in which the proceeding is pending, and last by the officers of the county in which the petition was filed and the proceeding pending, and shall then be ready for issuance. Such bonds shall show upon their face that they are issued by the several counties having lands in such district. The assessments on the lands in each county shall only be bound and liable for their pro rata part of such bonds and interest on the bonds, and according to assessments levied; and only the lands in such district shall be liable for the assessments levied on the lands as provided in part 9 of this chapter. It is the duty of each of the officers in each of the counties to sign, and countersign, and seal such bonds, as provided in part 9 of this chapter, when they have been ordered issued by the court in which the petition was filed and proceeding is pending.

Acts 1915, ch. 61, § 6; Shan., § 3871a167; Code 1932, § 4403; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 16, 22, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-1512; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2; T.C.A. §69-6-1107.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

69-5-1108. Proceeds of bond sale.

The proceeds of the bonds, when sold, shall be deposited with one (1) or more of the trustees as directors of such district shall direct, but so the same, or any part thereof, that may be placed in the hands of a county trustee other than the trustee of the county where the proceeding is pending, may be transferred to the trustee of the county where the proceeding is pending, if deemed best, to the end that the entire fund may be paid out by the trustee on proper warrants drawn. The county mayor of the county where the proceeding is pending shall draw all warrants upon, or against the funds, or proceeds of bonds to meet lawful demands of the district, as now provided by law, and draw warrants to transfer the funds as provided in this section. But any of the trustees before receiving any of the proceeds of such bonds shall give bond to account for them as the law now provides.

Acts 1915, ch. 61, § 6; Shan., § 3871a168; Code 1932, § 4404; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 16, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-1513; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2; T.C.A. §69-6-1108.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

69-5-1109. Map of district.

The engineer of the district shall show in the engineer's report upon the map of the district the location of the line or lines between counties, and show clearly what tracts of land within such district lie in each of the counties of the district.

Acts 1915, ch. 61, § 8; Shan., § 3871a170; mod. Code 1932, § 4406; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-1514; T.C.A. §69-6-1109.